District of Columbia statutes.
38-132

Authority of acting Superintendent.

The authority conferred on the Superintendent of Schools by § 38-131 shall, during his authorized absence, devolve on the person designated as acting Superintendent of Schools.

History

Apr. 22, 1932, 47 Stat. 134, ch. 131, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-109.
1973 Ed., § 31-107.